Vermont statutes. Title 12 Court Procedure
Subchapter 2. Forms for Pleadings and Trial

§§ 5961,
5962.
Repealed.
1971, No. 185 (Adj. Sess.), § 237, eff. March 29, 1972.

§ 5963.
Writ and complaint—justice ejectment.

Writ and Complaint in Justice Ejectment

STATE OF VERMONT,
To any sheriff or constable in
County, ss.
the State, or to
}
an indifferent person,
Greeting: By the authority of the State of Vermont, you are hereby commanded to attach the goods, chattels, or estate of of , in the county of to the value of dollars, and notify thereof according to law, (and for want thereof take his or her body, if to be found within your precinct, and him or her safely keep so that you have him or her to appear before me) (and also notify to appear before me) at , on the day of at o’clock in the noon, then and there to answer to the complaint of of , in the county of . For that the said defendant, , is in the possession of certain lands (and tenements) situated in the town of , in the county of , described as follows: (which lands (and tenements) the said defendant holds unlawfully and against the right of the plaintiff, as it is said. insert a brief description) To the damage of the plaintiff dollars, to recover which and the quiet and peaceable possession of the premises, with just costs, the plaintiff brings this action. Fail not, but service and return make according to law. ( Conclude as in § 5903.)

Click to view

§ 5964.
Repealed.
1979, No. 2, § 2, eff. Feb. 14, 1979.

§§ 5965,
5966.
Repealed.
1971, No. 185 (Adj. Sess.), § 237, eff. March 29, 1972.

§ 5967.
Witness—subpoena for appearance before grand jury.

Subpoena for Witness Before Grand Jury

(Commencement and direction as in § 5903.)

By the authority of the State of Vermont, you are hereby commanded to summon of to appear before the grand jury of the county of , at the courthouse in , on the day of A.D. 20 , at o’clock in the noon, to give evidence of what they know relative to all matters of complaint pending and to be investigated before such grand jury; and this neither of them may omit, as they will answer their default under the pains and penalties of the law in such case made and provided. Fail not, but service and return make according to law. Dated at, etc.
G. H., Clerk, Justice of the Peace,
Notary Public

Click to view

§§ 5968-5971.
Repealed.
1971, No. 185 (Adj. Sess.), § 237, eff. March 29, 1972.

§ 5972.
Repealed.
1979, No. 2, § 2, eff. Feb. 14, 1979.